src/fst/incoming/stems/noun_stems.lexc
! Divvun & Giellatekno - open source grammars for Sámi and other languages
! Copyright © 2000-2010 The University of Tromsø
! http://giellatekno.uit.no & http://divvun.no
!
! This program is free software; you can redistribute and/or modify
! this file under the terms of the GNU General Public License as published by
! the Free Software Foundation, either version 3 of the License, or
! (at your option) any later version. The GNU General Public License
! is found at http://www.gnu.org/licenses/gpl.html. It is
! also available in the file $GTHOME/LICENSE.txt.
!
! Other licensing options are available upon request, please contact
! giellatekno@hum.uit.no or divvun@hum.uit.no

! ========================================================================== !
!!                           !!!Plains Cree noun stems                           
! ========================================================================== !


!! Wolvengrey types:

!! * NI1  C-Initial Regular NI Stem : cîmân “canoe, boat”
!! * NI1  V-Initial Regular NI Stem : astotin “hat, cap”
!! * NI2  C-Initial VW NI Stem : mîkisasâkay “beaded coat, beaded dress”
!! * NI2  V-Initial VW NI Stem : oskasâkay “new coat, new dress”
!! * NI3  C-Initial Cw NI Stem : pahkêkinw:pahkêkinw “leather, rawhide”
!! * NI3  V-Initial Cw NI Stem : askêkin:askêkinw “fresh rawhide”
!! * NI4  C-Initial Single-Syllable NI Stem : wâw– “egg”
!! * NI4  V-Initial Single-Syllable NI Stem : osk-ây– “new item, new thing”
!! * NI4  V-Initial Single-Syllable irregular NI Stem : ôs– “canoe, boat”
!! * NI4w C-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NI Stem : mihkw– “blood”

!! * NA1  C-Initial Regular NA Stem : pahkwêsikan “bannock”
!! * NA1  V-Initial Regular NA Stem : asikan “sock”
!! * NA2  C-Initial V-Glide NA Stem : kihc-ôkiniy “tomato”
!! * NA2  V-Initial V-Glide NA Stem : ayapiy “net”
!! * NA3  C-Initial C-/w/ NA Stem : masinahikanâhtik:masinahikanâhtikw– “pencil”
!! * NA3  V-Initial C-/w/ NA Stem : askihkw– “kettle, pail”
!! * NA4  C-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem : niska “goose” (and siht– “spruce”)
!! * NA4  V-Initial Single-Syllable NA Stem : esa “clam; shell”
!! * NA4w C-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NA Stem : wâhkwa:wâhkw “roe, fish eggs; lump of roe”
!! * NA4w V-Initial Single-Syllable-/w/ NA Stem : ihkwa:ihkw “louse”

! Target forms:
! astotin				IN_DECL					NI1
! oskasâkay				IN_DECL					NI2
! pahkêkin:pahkêkinw	IN_DECL					NI3w
! oskâyi				INimDECL				NI4 +im
! ôsi:ô					IN_DECLosi				NI4 irr. stem
! mihko:mihk			INimDECLw_ONESYLL_SG	NI4w -o, only Sg
! 
! asikan				AN_DECL					NA1		
! pahkwêsikan			AN_DECL				NA1 + im
! ayapiy				AN_DECL					NA2
! askihk:askihkw		AN_DECL					NA3
! askihk:askihkw		AN_DECL				NA3w + im
! esa					AN_DECL				NA4 +im
! niska					AN_DECLisis			NA4 +im, only Dim is
! ihkwa:ihkw			ANimDECLw				NA4w +im


!! !!The stems

!! !Animate and inanimate Nouns
!    =============

LEXICON STEMS
!! @LEXNAME@ adds an affixmark and redirects to STEMLIST
0:%> PRENOUNS ;
0:%> STEMLIST ;

LEXICON STEMLISTPRE
-:%> STEMLIST ;
-:-%> STEMLIST ;

LEXICON DEP-KINTERMSSTEMS  ! dependent nouns
!! @LEXNAME@ adds an affixmark and redirects to KINTERMLIST
 0:%> DEP-KINTERMLIST ;

LEXICON PRENOUNS
amisko STEMLISTPRE "beaver, pertaining to the beaver" ;
anikwacâsi STEMLISTPRE "squirrel, pertaining to the squirrel" ;
apihci STEMLISTPRE "small" ;
apisci STEMLISTPRE "small, little" ;
apisi STEMLISTPRE "small, tiny" ;
apist STEMLISTPRE "small" ;
asinîskâwi STEMLISTPRE "rocky, stoney; pertaining to an area of many stones; pertaining to the area of the Canadian Shield" ;
asiskîwi STEMLISTPRE "of mud, of clay" ;
aski STEMLISTPRE "raw, fresh" ;
askihtako STEMLISTPRE "green; blue, blue-green" ;
askîwi STEMLISTPRE "of the earth, pertaining to the earth" ;
atimo STEMLISTPRE "pertaining to the dog, doglike" ;
ayakaski STEMLISTPRE "wide" ;
ayîki STEMLISTPRE "frog, pertaining to the frog or toad" ;
âhkiko STEMLISTPRE "seal, pertaining to the seal" ;
âhkwaci STEMLISTPRE "hard, frozen, frozen solid" ;
âkayâsîwi STEMLISTPRE "English, pertaining to the English" ;
âpakosîsi STEMLISTPRE "mouse, pertaining to the mouse" ;
cimâsko STEMLISTPRE "short, stout; truncated" ;
êyiko STEMLISTPRE "ant, pertaining to the ant" ;
iyini STEMLISTPRE "common, plain" ;
iyinito STEMLISTPRE "common, plain" ;
kayâsi STEMLISTPRE "old; long ago, old-time" ;
kâspi STEMLISTPRE "crunchy" ;
kêhtê STEMLISTPRE "old, respected by age" ;
kihci STEMLISTPRE "great, big" ;
kihcihtwâwi STEMLISTPRE "of exalted character; venerable, holy" ;
kinêpiko STEMLISTPRE "of or pertaining to the snake" ;
kino STEMLISTPRE "long, length" ;
kîski STEMLISTPRE "severed, amputated, cut off" ;
kîsô STEMLISTPRE "warmth" ;
kîwâci STEMLISTPRE "lonely, desolate, bereaved" ;
kohkôsi STEMLISTPRE "porcine, pertaining to the pig, piggish" ;
mahihkani STEMLISTPRE "pertaining to the wolf, wolfish, wolf-like, wolven" ;
mahkêsîsi STEMLISTPRE "pertaining to the fox, fox-like" ;
mahki STEMLISTPRE "big, large" ;
manitowi STEMLISTPRE "spiritual, of or pertaining to spirits; of or pertaining to the Creator, God" ;
mâci STEMLISTPRE "beginning" ;
mâski STEMLISTPRE "crippled, lame; deformed" ;
mâyi STEMLISTPRE "bad, ugly, nasty, evil, wicked" ;
mihkowi STEMLISTPRE "bloody" ;
mikisiwi STEMLISTPRE "pertaining to the eagle" ;
misi STEMLISTPRE "big, large, great" ;
miyo STEMLISTPRE "good; beautiful, valuable" ;
mostoso STEMLISTPRE "cow; buffalo; pertaining to cattle or buffalo" ;
môniyâw STEMLISTPRE "White, White-Man's" ;
môniyâwi STEMLISTPRE "White-Man's" ;
môso STEMLISTPRE "of or pertaining to the moose" ;
namêwi STEMLISTPRE "of or pertaining to the sturgeon" ;
nâpê STEMLISTPRE "male, maleness" ;
nêhiyawi STEMLISTPRE "Cree" ;
niski STEMLISTPRE "pertaining to the goose" ;
nîci STEMLISTPRE "my fellow ..." ;
nôsê STEMLISTPRE "female" ;
oski STEMLISTPRE "young, new, fresh" ;
sîpihko STEMLISTPRE "blue" ;
sîsîpi STEMLISTPRE "duck, pertaining to a duck" ;
takahki STEMLISTPRE "good, nice" ;
wacasko STEMLISTPRE "muskrat, pertaining to muskrat" ;
wâpi STEMLISTPRE "white" ;
wâpiski STEMLISTPRE "white" ;
wâposo STEMLISTPRE "rabbit, pertaining to rabbits" ;
wîci STEMLISTPRE "one of his/her own kind; fellow" ;
wîhki STEMLISTPRE "sweet; fragrant" ;
